Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Bill of Sale; Numbers and Marks on Motor Vehicles

§ 63-17-1.
Sale, purchase, etc., of automobile without bill of sale.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to sell, purchase or own any automobile unless the seller shall furnish to and the buyer shall take and reserve, a bill of sale, signed by the seller, showing the make and model, vehicle identification number and other identifying marks thereof, the address of the seller, and the name and address of the person from whom the seller purchased. Said bill of sale may be in the following form:

“Name of purchaser_______________Address of purchaser_______________Manufacturer_______________Model_______________Vehicle identification number_______________Other marks_______________Name and address of person from whom seller purchased_______________Signature of seller_______________Address of seller_______________ .”

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5789x; 1930, § 5589; 1942, § 8065; Laws, 1920, ch. 222; Laws, 1970, ch. 483, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 63-17-3.
Recordation of bill of sale; affidavit in lieu of bill of sale; fees.

The bill of sale provided for in Section 63-17-1 may be recorded in a book to be provided and kept for that purpose in the office of the clerk of the chancery court in the county of the residence of the owner of the automobile. The owner or other person having an automobile in his possession who has no bill of sale may make affidavit, stating the name of the party from whom purchase was made, place and date of purchase, particularly describing the automobile, by motor number, and otherwise as prescribed for a bill of sale, which affidavit may be recorded. A copy of the bill of sale, or affidavit of ownership as made and certified by the clerk, shall be received and accepted in lieu of the original. The clerk shall charge and collect a fee of fifty cents for recording and certifying the record thereof, and shall charge and collect a fee of fifty cents for furnishing a certified copy of such bill of sale or affidavit.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5789y; 1930, § 5590; 1942, § 8066; Laws, 1920, ch. 222.

§ 63-17-5.
Display of bill of sale to law enforcement officer.

Any owner or person having an automobile in his possession shall, upon request of any sheriff, constable, justice of the peace, mayor, marshal or police officer, exhibit to such officer for inspection the bill of sale provided for in Section 63-17-1, or shall permit such officer to make inspection of such automobile, and shall answer all inquiries truthfully that may be propounded by such officer with references to such automobile and the history of the title thereto. Refusal so to do shall subject such person to immediate arrest by such officer, without warrant, and subject him to the penalties prescribed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5789z; 1930, § 5591; 1942, § 8067; Laws, 1920, ch. 222.

§ 63-17-7.
Failure of officer to perform acts authorized by § 63-17-5; fees of officers.

If any officer mentioned in Section 63-17-5 shall fail, neglect or refuse, upon request of any person who shall declare himself to be interested, to perform any act authorized in said section, or to furnish a written statement to such person, showing the result of such examination and inquiry, such officer shall be subject to the penalties prescribed by law. Any such request of such officer shall be accompanied by payment, or tender, of a fee of one dollar for each examination, and fifty cents a mile for each mile or fraction thereof over one-fourth, going to and returning from the place of examination; moreover, the place shall not be more than five miles distant and within the jurisdiction of the officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5789a1; 1930, § 5592; 1942, § 8068; Laws, 1920, ch. 222.

§ 63-17-9.
Seizure of automobile by law enforcement officer.

Automobile owners shall not be required at all times to keep the bill of sale provided for in Section 63-17-1 with their automobiles. However, failure to have the same therein shall not excuse them, or any person in possession, from furnishing the information required by Section 63-17-5, and upon affidavit made before the officer demanding the information that the person making the same has good reason to believe and does believe that such automobile is stolen, such officer may, in his discretion, take possession thereof and retain the same for such reasonable time as may be required for the necessary investigation to be made.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5789b1; 1930, § 5593; 1942, § 8069; Laws, 1920, ch. 222.

§§ 63-17-11 through 63-17-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 469, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§63-17-11. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5789c1; 1930, § 5594; 1942, § 8070; Laws, 1920, ch. 222]

§63-17-13. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5789c1; 1930, § 5594; 1942, § 8070; Laws, 1920, ch. 222]

§63-17-15. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5789d1; 1930, § 5595; 1942,§ 8071; Laws, 1920, ch. 222]

§ 63-17-17.
Penalties.

Any person violating any of Sections 63-17-1 through 63-17-9, shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned in the county jail not more than six (6) months, or be both so fined and imprisoned.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5789d1; 1930, § 5595; 1942, § 8071; Laws, 1920, ch. 222; Laws, 1989, ch. 469, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1989.